Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3907
Continuing education requirements; extension of time; failure to comply; effect.

(1) For good cause shown, the director may grant an extension of time during which the requirements imposed by sections 44-3901 to 44-3908 may be completed, but such extension of time shall not exceed the period of one year.

(2) The director shall not renew a license nor issue a new license to any licensee who has failed to comply with the requirements set forth in sections 44-3901 to 44-3908.

Laws 1982, LB 274, § 7.